Hawaii, session 2026, GM1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that in 1853, an
estimated seventy-five per cent of the population in the Kingdom
of Hawaii over the age of sixteen was literate. By 1878, eighty
per cent were literate in Hawaiian, English, or a European
language, making Hawaii one of the most literate nations in the
world at the time. The legislature recognizes that the
department of education is committed to preserving and honoring
this legacy by ensuring that all students are proficient in
reading by the time they graduate.
The legislature further finds that, currently, just over
half of Hawaii’s students are reading proficiently. To improve
student reading proficiency, it is necessary to address the root
causes that contribute to the present levels of poor reading
proficiency rates. A proactive and systematic approach is
required to achieve high literacy rates for all students.
Presently, the department of education is striving to address
poor reading proficiency rates by administering a universal
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
screening at the beginning, middle, and end of the year for all
students from kindergarten to grade nine. The purpose of this
universal screening is to identify students who may be at risk
for reading failure, and to provide evidence-based interventions
to support these students, in addition to core-structured
literacy instruction. However, not all universal screenings are
able to detect or identify students who may have certain
underlying language challenges that impact learning. This is
problematic because students with dyslexia or other
developmental language disorders may need more intensive support
or a more individualized intervention program to address the
causes of their reading challenges. Unfortunately, Hawaii is
the only state in the country that lacks dyslexia-specific laws
to support students in this area.
The legislature also finds that evidence shows that
students who are not identified and brought to reading
proficiency by third grade face significantly lower chances of
success in the future. However, a substantial body of evidence
also indicates that, with effective assessment and instruction,
all students can learn to read. This includes students with
language and literacy challenges and students who have dyslexia.
2026-3303 HB1891 GDI HMSO
nniiHiiiiHiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
The purpose of this Act is to support students with
dyslexia and students with language and literacy challenges by:
(1) Requiring department of education schools to
administer department approved dyslexia sensitive
linguistically appropriate universal screening as a
part of the universal screening process;
(2) Implementing evidence-based interventions for students
who are identified as having dyslexia and students who
are flagged as having language and literacy challenges
through the Hawaii multi-tiered system of support;
(3) Providing professional development for teachers to
increase the implementation of structured literacy
instruction; and
(4) Supporting pre-service teacher programs in training
their general and special education teacher candidates
in structured literacy instruction.
SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
”§302A- Dyslexia sensitive linguistically appropriate
universal screening; evidence-based interventions; professional
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO
lllillililllilSSglhieilHII!

Page 4 1891
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
development; pre-service requirements. (a) Beginning with the
2028-2029 school year, all department schools shall administer
dyslexia sensitive linguistically appropriate universal
screening approved by the department for:
(1) All students in kindergarten through third grade; and
(2) Any new student entering a department school for the
first time in the State.
(b) The dyslexia sensitive linguistically appropriate
universal screening shall be administered as part of the
established universal screening process and shall also include,
as developmentally appropriate, the following:
(1) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(2) Sound symbol recognition;
(3) Alphabet knowledge;
(4) Decoding skills;
(5) Rapid naming skills, including letter naming and
letter sound fluency;
(6) Encoding skills;
(7) Oral reading accuracy and fluency; and
(8) Oral language.
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO 4
MHIIHniililiWINH

Page 5 1891
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(c) All department schools shall implement evidence-based
interventions for students identified as having dyslexia and
students who are flagged as struggling readers through the
universal screening process. Interventions and progress
monitoring of the identified students shall be implemented
within the established Hawaii multi-tiered system of support
framework.
(d) The department shall provide professional learning
opportunities for staff in complex areas and department schools
on the implementation of structured literacy instruction and
evidence-based interventions.
(e) Structured literacy instruction, as required under
this section, shall involve detailed, step-by-step instruction
necessary for developing strong reading and writing skills. In
addition to explicit and systematic instruction, a structured
literacy approach shall provide multiple opportunities for
students to practice a skill or strategy and require teachers to
provide immediate, specific feedback to students and
continuously monitor progress.
(f) The department shall collaborate with pre-service
teacher programs in higher education institutions to ensure
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO


Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
general education teacher candidates and special education
teacher candidates are trained on the implementation of
structured literacy instruction to support all learners.
(g) This section shall not apply to Hawaiian language
immersion schools and charter schools.
(h) For the purposes of this section:
"Dyslexia" means a specific learning disability that is
neurological in origin and characterized by difficulties with
accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and
decoding abilities, which typically result from a deficit in the
phonological component of language and literacy development that
is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and
the provision of effective classroom instruction. Secondary
consequences of dyslexia may include problems in reading
comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede the
growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.
"Dyslexia sensitive linguistically appropriate universal
screening" means an assessment that measures a student's ability
to demonstrate phonological and phonemic awareness; sound-symbol
recognition; alphabet knowledge; decoding skills; rapid naming
skills, including letter naming and letter sound fluency;
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO
MIIMiWIilMiiniliH

Page 7
H.B. NO. JiSi
C.D. 1
encoding skills; oral reading accuracy and fluency; and accuracy
of word reading on grade-level text.
"Hawaii multi-tiered system of support" means a
comprehensive continuum of evidence-based, systemic practices to
support a rapid response to a student's needs, with regular
observation to facilitate data-based instructional decision­
making .
"Phonological component of language and literacy
development" means the ability to recognize that a spoken word
consists of a sequence of individual sounds and the ability to
manipulate individual sounds when speaking.
"Structured literacy instruction" means an evidence-based
approach that emphasizes explicit and systematic instruction in
the following components of literacy:
(1) Phonological awareness;
(2) Phonics (decoding and spelling);
(3) Fluency;
(4) Vocabulary;
(5) Comprehension; and
(6) Written expression.
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO 7

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Universal screening" means the process of administering a
brief standardized assessment to all students to identify those
who are at risk of poor reading outcomes."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3303 HB1891 CDl HMSO

IIIDIDIHHiillllHIli

1891
H.B. NO
I b
oco
O b
APPROVED this 13th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1891, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
----------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1891, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
179-26